Utah statutes.
41-1a-121.   Electronic Payment Fee Restricted Account.

(1)  As used in this section, "account" means the Electronic Payment Fee Restricted Account created by this section.

(2)  There is created within the General Fund a restricted account known as the Electronic Payment Fee Restricted Account.

(3) (a)  The account shall be funded from the fees imposed and collected under Sections 41-1a-1221, 41-3-604, 41-22-36, and 73-18-25.

(b)  The fees described in Subsection (3)(a) shall be paid to the division, which shall deposit them in the account.

(4)  The Legislature shall appropriate the funds in the account to the commission to cover the costs of electronic payments.

(5)  In accordance with Section 63J-1-602.2, appropriations made to the division from the account are nonlapsing.



Enacted by Chapter 189, 2011 General Session

